California, session 20252026, AB27.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17157.5 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17157.5. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event, beginning on May 1, 2022, that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles, California.(2) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment” means any amount received by a taxpayer on or after March 1, 2024, as compensation for loss, damages, expenses, relocation, suffering, loss in real property value, closing costs with respect to real property, including realtor commissions, or inconvenience, including access to real property, resulting from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event, if the amount was provided by either of the following:(A) A federal, state, or local governmental agency.(B) Waste Connections, Inc., any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of Waste Connections, Inc., or any person related to Waste Connections, Inc.(c) The taxpayer payor shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.(d) For the purpose of complying with Section 41 in regards to the exclusion provided by this section and Section 24309.9, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(1) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide essential relief to individuals who have suffered loss, damages, expenses, relocation, suffering, and inconvenience resulting from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event.(2) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion achieves the stated goal, purpose, and objective shall be the number of taxpayers that excluded Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature event payment amounts from gross income, and the aggregate amount of related payments arising out of the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event. There is no available data to collect or report with respect to the exclusion.(e) This section shall become inoperative on December 1, 2029.SEC. 2. Section 24309.9 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24309.9. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event” means the elevated temperature landfill event, beginning on May 1, 2022, that occurred beneath the Chiquita Canyon Landfill in the County of Los Angeles, California.(2) “Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment” means any amount received by a taxpayer on or after March 1, 2024, as compensation for loss, damages, expenses, relocation, suffering, loss in real property value, closing costs with respect to real property, including realtor commissions, or inconvenience, including access to real property, resulting from the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event, if the amount was provided by either of the following:(A) A federal, state, or local governmental agency.(B) Waste Connections, Inc., any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of Waste Connections, Inc., or any person related to Waste Connections, Inc.(c) The taxpayer payor shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board.(d) This section shall become inoperative on December 1, 2029.SEC. 3.This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.SEC. 3. Section 10010 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10010. (a) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, a Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under a means-tested program, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) Childcare and development programs, as defined in Section 10213.5.(2) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.(3) The Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment (Kin-GAP) Program, as described in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3.(4) The State Supplementary Program (SSP) for Aged, Blind and Disabled, as described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3.(5) The Medi-Cal program, as described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.(6) The Adoption Assistance Program (AAP), as described in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4.(7) General assistance programs, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 5.(8) The CalFresh program, as described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6.(9) The California Food Assistance Program (CFAP), as described in Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) of Part 6.(10) The Cash Assistance Program for Aged, Blind, and Disabled Legal Immigrants (CAPI), as described in Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6.(b) Notwithstanding any other law and to the extent permitted by federal law, any Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event payment amount received by a taxpayer shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for guaranteed income payments or the amount of those guaranteed income payments.(c) For purposes of this section, “guaranteed income payments” means unconditional, recurring, regular cash payments, whether publicly or privately funded, that are intended to support the basic needs of eligible recipients, including, but not limited to, payments provided through pilot programs or projects receiving funding from the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program, as described in Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 18997) of Part 6, or payments provided through locally funded programs.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that the addition of Sections 17157.5 and 24309.9 to the Revenue and Taxation Code by this act serves a public purpose of remedying the burden the Chiquita Canyon elevated temperature landfill event has placed on the residents of the area. Individuals have had to home harden, cover severely high utility bills, suffer new health complications, and potentially relocate as a result of this disaster they did not cause. The moneys received from the Chiquita Canyon Operators is in direct response to that disaster.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.